Utah statutes.
76-5-402.2.   Object rape.
(1)  A person who, without the victim's consent, causes the penetration,
however slight, of the genital or anal opening of another person who is 14
years of age or older, by any foreign object, substance, instrument, or
device, including a part of the human body other than the mouth or genitals,
with intent to cause substantial emotional or bodily pain to the victim or
with the intent to arouse or gratify the sexual desire of any person, commits
an offense which is a first degree felony, punishable by a term of
imprisonment of:
(a)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b) or (c), not less than five years
and which may be for life;
(b)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(c) or (2), 15 years and which may be
for life, if the trier of fact finds that during the course of the commission
of the object rape the defendant caused serious bodily injury to another; or
(c)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that at the time of the
commission of the object rape, the defendant was previously convicted of a
grievous sexual offense.
(2)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (1)(b), a court finds that
a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (1)(b) is in the interests
of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the record, the court
may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than:
(a)  ten years and which may be for life; or
(b)  six years and which may be for life.
(3)  The provisions of Subsection (2) do not apply when a person is sentenced
under Subsection (1)(a) or (c).
(4)  Imprisonment under Subsection (1)(b), (1)(c), or (2) is mandatory in
accordance with Section 76-3-406.
